Hawaii statutes.
§356D-28 Public housing revolving fund. (a)
There is established the public housing revolving fund to be administered by
the authority. Notwithstanding section 36-21, the proceeds in the fund shall
be used for long-term and other special financings of the authority and for
necessary expenses in administering this chapter.

(b) All moneys received and collected by the
authority, not otherwise pledged, obligated, or required by law to be placed in
any other special fund, shall be deposited into the public housing revolving
fund. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 42, §11]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next